South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H4517.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Chapter 1, Title 11 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 11-1-130.  (A) Beginning with Fiscal Year 2026-2027, an appropriations bill or amendment may not include earmarked funds designated for specific projects or entities outside the core budgetary process. (B) Each fiscal year, after the Office of Revenue and Fiscal Affairs certifies a projected budget surplus, the Budget Committee shall divide the surplus equally among all members of the General Assembly. (C) The surplus shall be divided equally among one hundred seventy members: one hundred twenty-four representatives in the House and forty-six senators in the Senate. (D) Each member shall allocate his district's portion of surplus funds solely to one or more of the following essential governmental functions within his district: (1) infrastructure; (2) public safety; or (3) K-12 education. (E) The Ways and Means Committee shall establish guidelines specifying the permissible uses of these funds within the designated essential functions to ensure accountability and compliance with state law. (F) Each member of the General Assembly shall submit an annual report detailing the allocation of their district's funds, subject to public disclosure and review by the Legislative Audit Council. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect on July 1, 2026. ----XX----